Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.250

Involuntary dissolution of towns—Hearing.

Any person owning property in or qualified to vote in the town may appear at the hearing and file written objections to the granting of the petition. If the court finds that the town has failed for two successive years to hold its regular municipal election or that its officers elected at a regular election have failed to qualify for two successive years thereby causing the government of the town to cease to function, it shall enter an order for disincorporation of the town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.250. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 76 s 3, part; RRS s 8931-3, part.]